District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1501

Purpose.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-59, § 3, 24 DCR 5975
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1234, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 2-101.
1973 Ed., § 2-942.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 12-261, Title I, § 1234 ( 46 DCR 3142), eff. April 20, 1999, provided:

“Sec. 1234. The District of Columbia Public Accounting Act of 1977, effective March 16, 1978 (D.C. Law 2-59; D.C. Code § 2-101 et seq. § 3-1501 et seq., 2001 Ed. ), relating to the licensure of public accountants is repealed and authority transferred to the Board of Accountancy established by D.C. Code [§ 47-2853.6 § 47-2853.06, 2001 Ed.].”

Editor's Notes